Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.110

Compensation for official duties or nonperformance.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

No state officer or state employee may, directly or indirectly, ask for or give or receive or agree to receive any compensation, gift, reward, or gratuity from a source for performing or omitting or deferring the performance of any official duty, unless otherwise authorized by law except: (1) The state of Washington; or (2) in the case of officers or employees of institutions of higher education or of the *Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute, a governmental entity, an agency or instrumentality of a governmental entity, or a nonprofit corporation organized for the benefit and support of the state employee's agency or other state agencies pursuant to an agreement with the state employee's agency.

[ 1996 c 213 s 5; 1994 c 154 s 111.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 17.